Utah statutes.
30-1-3.   Marriage in belief of death or divorce of former spouse -- Issue
legitimate.
When a marriage is contracted in good faith and in the belief of the parties
that a former husband or wife, then living and not legally divorced, is dead
or legally divorced, the issue of such marriage born or begotten before notice
of the mistake shall be the legitimate issue of both parties.
